California statutes. Penal Code
(d) Any other honorably retired peace officer who during the course and scope of his or her appointment as a peace officer was authorized to, and did, carry a firearm.

(e) Any full-time paid peace officer of another state or the federal government who is carrying out official duties while in California.

(f) Any person summoned by any of these officers to assist in making arrests or preserving the peace while the person is actually engaged in assisting that officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 267, Sec. 1.   (AB 703)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

25452.

A peace officer and an honorably retired peace officer shall, when leaving a handgun in an unattended vehicle, secure the handgun in the vehicle pursuant to Section 25140.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 651, Sec. 2.   (SB 869)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

25455.

(a) Any peace officer described in Section 25450 who has been honorably retired shall be issued an identification certificate by the law enforcement agency from which the officer retired.

(b) The issuing agency may charge a fee necessary to cover any reasonable expenses incurred by the agency in issuing certificates pursuant to this article.

(c) Any officer, except an officer listed in Section 830.1 or 830.2, subdivision (a) of Section 830.33, or subdivision (c) of Section 830.5 who retired prior to January 1, 1981, shall have an endorsement on the identification certificate stating that the issuing agency approves the officer’s
 carrying of a concealed firearm.

(d) An honorably retired peace officer listed in Section 830.1 or 830.2, subdivision (a) of Section 830.33, or subdivision (c) of Section 830.5 who retired prior to January 1, 1981, shall not be required to obtain an endorsement from the issuing agency to carry a concealed firearm.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25460.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), no endorsement or renewal endorsement issued pursuant to Section 25465 shall be effective unless it is in the format set forth in subdivision (c).

(b) Any peace officer listed in subdivision (f) of Section 830.2 or in subdivision (c) of Section 830.5, who retired between January 2, 1981, and on or before December 31, 1988, and who is authorized to carry a concealed firearm pursuant to this article, shall not be required to have an endorsement in the format set forth in subdivision (c) until the time of the issuance, on or after January 1, 1989, of a renewal endorsement pursuant to Section 25465.

(c) A certificate issued pursuant to Section 25455 for any person who is not listed in Section 830.1 or 830.2, subdivision (a) of Section 830.33, or subdivision (c) of Section 830.5, or for any person retiring after January 1, 1981, shall be in the following format: it shall be on a 2x3 inch card, bear the photograph of the retiree, include the retiree’s name, date of birth, the date that the retiree retired, and the name and address of the agency from which the retiree retired, and have stamped on it the endorsement “CCW Approved” and the date the endorsement is to be renewed. A certificate issued pursuant to Section 25455 shall not be valid as identification for the sale, purchase, or transfer of a firearm.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25465.

Every five years, a retired peace officer, except an officer listed in Section 830.1 or 830.2, subdivision (a) of Section 830.33, or subdivision (c) of Section 830.5 who retired prior to January 1, 1981, shall petition the issuing agency for renewal of the officer’s privilege to carry a concealed firearm.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25470.

(a) The agency from which a peace officer is honorably retired may, upon initial retirement of that peace officer, or at any time subsequent thereto, deny or revoke for good cause the retired officer’s privilege to carry a concealed firearm. 

(b) A peace officer who is listed in Section 830.1 or 830.2, subdivision (a) of Section 830.33, or subdivision (c) of Section 830.5 who retired prior to January 1, 1981, shall have the privilege to carry a concealed firearm denied or revoked by having the agency from which the officer retired stamp on the officer’s identification certificate “No CCW privilege.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25475.

(a) An honorably retired peace officer who is listed in subdivision (c) of Section 830.5 and authorized to carry a concealed firearm by this article shall meet the training requirements of Section 832 and shall qualify with the firearm at least annually.

(b) The individual retired peace officer shall be responsible for maintaining eligibility to carry a concealed firearm.

(c) The Department of Justice shall provide subsequent arrest notification pursuant to Section 11105.2 regarding honorably retired peace officers listed in subdivision (c) of Section 830.5 to the agency from which the officer has retired.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Conditional Exemptions [25505. - 25595.]

25505.

In order for a firearm to be exempted under this article, while being transported to or from a place, the firearm shall be unloaded and kept in a locked container, and the course of travel shall include only those deviations between authorized locations as are reasonably necessary under the circumstances.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25510.

Section 25400 does not apply to, or affect, any of the following:

(a) The possession of a firearm by an authorized participant in a motion picture, television, or video production, or an entertainment event, when the participant lawfully uses the firearm as part of that production or event, or while going directly to, or coming directly from, that production or event.

(b) The transportation of a firearm by an authorized employee or agent of a supplier of firearms when going directly to, or coming directly from, a motion picture, television, or video production, or an entertainment event, for the purpose of providing that firearm to an authorized
 participant to lawfully use as a part of that production or event.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25515.

Section 25400 does not apply to, or affect, the possession of a firearm in a locked container by a member of any club or organization, organized for the purpose of lawfully collecting and lawfully displaying pistols, revolvers, or other firearms, while the member is at a meeting of the club or organization or while going directly to, and coming directly from, a meeting of the club or organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25520.

Section 25400 does not apply to, or affect, the transportation of a firearm by a participant when going directly to, or coming directly from, a recognized safety or hunter safety class, or a recognized sporting event involving that firearm.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25525.

(a) Section 25400 does not apply to, or affect, the transportation of a firearm by any citizen of the United States or legal resident over the age of 18 years who resides or is temporarily within this state, and who is not within the excepted classes prescribed by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9 of this title, or Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, directly between any of the following places:

(1) The person’s place of residence.

(2) The person’s place of business.

(3) Private
 property owned or lawfully possessed by the person.

(b) Section 25400 does not apply to, or affect, the transportation of a firearm by a person listed in subdivision (a) when going directly from the place where that person lawfully received that firearm to that person’s place of residence or place of business or to private property owned or lawfully possessed by that person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25530.

Section 25400 does not apply to, or affect, the transportation of a firearm by a person when going directly to, or coming directly from, a fixed place of business or private residential property for the purpose of the lawful repair or the lawful sale, loan, or transfer of that firearm.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25535.

Section 25400 does not apply to, or affect, any of the following:

(a) The transportation of a firearm by a person when going directly to, or coming directly from, a gun show, swap meet, or similar event to which the public is invited, for the purpose of displaying that firearm in a lawful manner. 

(b) The transportation of a firearm by a person when going directly to, or coming directly from, a gun show or event, as defined in Section 478.100 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, for the purpose of lawfully transferring, selling, or loaning that firearm in accordance with Section 27545.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25540.

Section 25400 does not apply to, or affect, the transportation of a firearm by a person when going directly to, or coming directly from, a target range, which holds a regulatory or business license, for the purposes of practicing shooting at targets with that firearm at that target range.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25545.

Section 25400 does not apply to, or affect, the transportation of a firearm by a person when going directly to, or coming directly from, a place designated by a person authorized to issue licenses pursuant to Section 26150, 26155, 26170, or 26215, when done at the request of the issuing agency so that the issuing agency can determine whether or not a license should be issued to that person to carry that firearm.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25550.

(a) Section 25400 does not apply to, or affect, the transportation of a firearm by a person when going directly to, or coming directly from, a lawful camping activity for the purpose of having that firearm available for lawful personal protection while at the lawful campsite.

(b) This section shall not be construed to override the statutory authority granted to the Department of Parks and Recreation or any other state or local governmental agencies to promulgate rules and regulations governing the administration of parks and campgrounds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25555.

(a) Section 25400 does not apply to, or affect, the transportation of a firearm by a person in order to comply with or utilize Section 26556, 26892, 27875, 27920, 27925, 29810, or 29830, as it pertains to that firearm.

(b) Section 25400 does not apply to or affect the transportation of a firearm by a person in order to comply with paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 32000 as it pertains to that firearm.

(c) Section 25400 does not apply to, or affect the transportation of, a firearm by a person in order to comply with Section 6389 of the Family Code.

(d) Section 25400 does not apply to, or affect the
 transportation of, a firearm by a person in order to comply with Section 527.9 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(e) Section 25400 does not apply to, or affect the transportation of, a firearm by a person in order to comply with Section 18120.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 17) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 544, Sec. 18.   (SB 899)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

25560.

Section 25400 does not apply to, or affect, the transportation of a firearm by a person in order to utilize Section 28000 as it pertains to that firearm.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25565.

Section 25400 does not apply to, or affect, the transportation of a firearm by a person in order to sell, deliver, or transfer the firearm as specified in Section 27850 or 31725 to an authorized representative of a city, city and county, county, or state or federal government that is acquiring the weapon as part of an authorized, voluntary program in which the entity is buying or receiving weapons from private individuals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25570.

Section 25400 does not apply to, or affect, any of the following:

(a) The transportation of a firearm by a person who finds the firearm, if the person is transporting the firearm in order to comply with Article 1 (commencing with Section 2080) of Chapter 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code as it pertains to that firearm, and, if the person is transporting the firearm to a law enforcement agency, the person gives prior notice to the law enforcement agency that the person is transporting the firearm to the law enforcement agency.

(b) The transportation of a firearm by a person who finds the firearm and is transporting it to a law enforcement
 agency for disposition according to law, if the person gives prior notice to the
 law enforcement agency that the person is transporting the firearm to the law enforcement agency for disposition according to law.

(c) The transportation of a firearm by a person who took the firearm from a person who was committing a crime against the person who took the firearm, and is transporting it to a law enforcement agency for disposition according to law, if the person gives prior notice to the law enforcement agency that the person is transporting the firearm to the law enforcement agency for disposition according to law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 110, Sec. 3.   (AB 1292)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

25575.

Section 25400 does not apply to, or affect, the transportation of a firearm by a person in order to comply with Section 27560 as it pertains to that firearm.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25580.

Section 25400 does not apply to, or affect, the transportation of a firearm that is a curio or relic, as defined in Section 478.11 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, by a person in order to comply with Section 27565 as it pertains to that firearm.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25585.

Section 25400 does not apply to, or affect, the transportation of a firearm by a person for the purpose of obtaining an identification number or mark assigned to that firearm from the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 23910.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25590.

Section 25400 does not apply to, or affect, the transportation of a firearm by a person if done directly between any of the places set forth below:

(a) A place where the person may carry that firearm pursuant to an exemption from the prohibition set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 25400.

(b) A place where that person may carry that firearm pursuant to an exemption from the prohibition set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 25850, or a place where the prohibition set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 25850 does not apply.

(c) A place where that person may carry a firearm pursuant to an
 exemption from the prohibition set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 26350, or a place where the prohibition set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 26350 does not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 11.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

25595.

This article does not prohibit or limit the otherwise lawful carrying or transportation of any handgun in accordance with the provisions listed in Section 16580.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 12.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Other Exemptions [25600. - 25655.]

25600.

(a) A violation of Section 25400 is justifiable when a person who possesses a firearm reasonably believes that person is in grave danger because of circumstances forming the basis of a current restraining order issued by a court against another person who has been found to pose a threat to the life or safety of the person who possesses the firearm. This section may not apply when the circumstances involve a mutual restraining order issued pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 6200) of the Family Code absent a factual finding of a specific threat to the person’s life or safety. It is not the intent of the Legislature to limit, restrict, or narrow the application of current statutory or judicial authority to apply this or other justifications to a
 defendant charged with violating Section 25400 or committing another similar offense.

(b) Upon trial for violating Section 25400, the trier of fact shall determine whether the defendant was acting out of a reasonable belief that the defendant was in grave danger.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25605.

(a) Section 25400 and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 26350) of Division 5 shall not apply to or affect any citizen of the United States or legal resident over the age of 18 years who resides or is temporarily within this state, and who is not within the excepted classes prescribed by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9 of this title, or Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, who carries, either openly or concealed, anywhere within the citizen’s or legal resident’s place of residence, place of business, or on private property owned or lawfully possessed by the citizen or legal resident, any handgun.

(b) No permit or
 license to purchase, own, possess, keep, or carry, either openly or concealed, shall be required of any citizen of the United States or legal resident over the age of 18 years who resides or is temporarily within this state, and who is not within the excepted classes prescribed by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9 of this title, or Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to purchase, own, possess, keep, or carry, either openly or concealed, a handgun within the citizen’s or legal resident’s place of residence, place of business, or on private property owned or lawfully possessed by the citizen or legal resident.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed as affecting the application of Sections 25850 to 26055, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 13.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

25610.

Section 25400 shall not be construed to prohibit any citizen of the United States over 18 years of age who resides or is temporarily within this state, and who is not prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm, from transporting or carrying any pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person for any purpose specified in Sections 25510 to 25595, inclusive, provided that either of the following applies to the firearm:

(a) The firearm is unloaded, within a motor vehicle, and locked in the vehicle’s trunk or in a locked container in the vehicle.

(b) The firearm is
 unloaded, carried by the person directly to or from any motor vehicle, and, while carrying the firearm, the firearm is contained within a locked container.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 249, Sec. 8.   (SB 2)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

25612.

A person shall, when leaving a handgun in an unattended vehicle, secure the handgun in the vehicle pursuant to Section 25140.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 651, Sec. 3.   (SB 869)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

25615.

Section 25400 does not apply to, or affect, the possession or transportation of unloaded pistols, revolvers, or other firearms capable of being concealed upon the person as merchandise by a person who is engaged in the business of manufacturing, importing, wholesaling, repairing, or dealing in firearms and who is licensed to engage in that business, or the authorized representative or authorized agent of that person, while engaged in the lawful course of the business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25620.

Section 25400 does not apply to, or affect, any member of the Army, Navy, Air Force, Coast Guard, or Marine Corps of the United States, or the National Guard, when on duty, or any organization that is by law authorized to purchase or receive those weapons from the United States or this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25625.

Section 25400 does not apply to, or affect, the carrying of unloaded pistols, revolvers, or other firearms capable of being concealed upon the person by duly authorized military or civil organizations while parading, or the members thereof when going to and from the places of meeting of their respective organizations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25630.

Section 25400 does not apply to, or affect, any guard or messenger of any common carrier, bank, or other financial institution, while actually employed in and about the shipment, transportation, or delivery of any money, treasure, bullion, bonds, or other thing of value within this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25635.

Section 25400 does not apply to, or affect, members of any club or organization organized for the purpose of practicing shooting at targets upon established target ranges, whether public or private, while the members are using pistols, revolvers, or other firearms capable of being concealed upon the person upon the target ranges, or transporting these firearms unloaded when going to and from the ranges.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25640.

Section 25400 does not apply to, or affect, licensed hunters or fishermen carrying pistols, revolvers, or other firearms capable of being concealed upon the person while engaged in hunting or fishing, or transporting those firearms unloaded when going to or returning from the hunting or fishing expedition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25645.

Sections 25140 and 25400 do not apply to, or affect, the transportation of unloaded firearms by a person operating a licensed common carrier or an authorized agent or employee thereof when the firearms are transported in conformance with applicable federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 651, Sec. 4.   (SB 869)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

25650.

(a) Upon approval of the sheriff of the county in which the retiree resides, Section 25400 does not apply to, or affect, any honorably retired federal officer or agent of any federal law enforcement agency, including, but not limited to, the Federal Bureau of Investigation, the United States Secret Service, the United States Customs Service, the federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives, the Federal Bureau of Narcotics, the United States Drug Enforcement Administration, the United States Border Patrol, and any officer or agent of the Internal Revenue Service who was authorized to carry weapons while on duty, who was assigned to duty within the state for a period of not less than one year, or who retired from active service in the state.

(b) A retired federal officer or agent shall provide the sheriff with certification from the agency from which the officer or agent retired certifying that person’s service in the state, stating the nature of that person’s retirement, and indicating the agency’s concurrence that the retired federal officer or agent should be accorded the privilege of carrying a concealed firearm.

(c) Upon that approval, the sheriff shall issue a permit to the retired federal officer or agent indicating that the retiree may carry a concealed firearm in accordance with this section. The permit shall be valid for a period not exceeding five years, shall be carried by the retiree while carrying a concealed firearm, and may be revoked for good cause.

(d) The sheriff of the county in which the retired federal officer or agent resides may
 require recertification prior to a permit renewal, and may suspend the privilege for cause. The sheriff may charge a fee necessary to cover any reasonable expenses incurred by the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 230.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

25655.

Section 25400 does not apply to, or affect, the carrying of a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person by a person who is authorized to carry that weapon in a concealed manner pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 26150).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Concealed Carrying of Firearm as a Nuisance [25700. - 25700.]

25700.

(a) The unlawful carrying of any handgun in violation of Section 25400 is a nuisance and is subject to Sections 18000 and 18005.

(b) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) Any firearm in the possession of the Department of Fish and Game.

(2) Any firearm that was used in the violation of any provision of the Fish and Game Code or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto.

(3) Any firearm that is forfeited pursuant to Section 5008.6 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Carrying a Loaded Firearm [25800. - 26110.]



  ARTICLE 1. Armed Criminal Action [25800. - 25800.]

25800.

(a) Every person who carries a loaded firearm with the intent to commit a felony is guilty of armed criminal action.

(b) Armed criminal action is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or in the state prison.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Crime of Carrying a Loaded Firearm in Public [25850. - 25850.]

25850.

(a) A person is guilty of carrying a loaded firearm when the person carries a loaded firearm on the person or in a vehicle while in any public place or on any public street in an incorporated city, city and county, or in any public place or on any public street in a prohibited area of an unincorporated area of a county or city and county.

(b) In order to determine whether or not a firearm is loaded for the purpose of enforcing this section, peace officers are authorized to examine any firearm carried by anyone on the person or in a vehicle while in any public place or on any public street in an incorporated city or prohibited area of an unincorporated territory. Refusal to allow a
 peace officer to inspect a firearm pursuant to this section constitutes probable cause for arrest for violation of this section.

(c) Carrying a loaded firearm in violation of this section is punishable, as follows:

(1) Where the person previously has been convicted of any felony, or of any crime made punishable by a provision listed in Section 16580, as a felony.

(2) Where the firearm is stolen and the person knew or had reasonable cause to believe that it was stolen, as a felony.

(3) Where the person is an active participant in a criminal street gang, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 186.22, under the California Street Terrorism Enforcement and
 Prevention Act (Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 186.20) of Title 7 of Part 1), as a felony.

(4) Where the person is not in lawful possession of the firearm, or is within a class of persons prohibited from possessing or acquiring a firearm pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9 of this title, or Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as a felony.

(5) Where the person has been convicted of a crime against a person or property, or of a narcotics or dangerous drug violation, by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment
 and fine.

(6) Where the person is not listed with the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 11106 as the recorded owner of the handgun, by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, or by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(7) In all cases other than those specified in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, as a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(d) (1) Every person convicted under this section who has previously been convicted of an
 offense enumerated in Section 23515, or of any crime made punishable under a provision listed in Section 16580, shall serve a term of at least three months in a county jail, or, if granted probation or if the execution or imposition of sentence is suspended, it shall be a condition thereof that the person be imprisoned for a period of at least three months.

(2) The court shall apply the three-month minimum sentence except in unusual cases where the interests of justice would best be served by granting probation or suspending the imposition or execution of sentence without the minimum imprisonment required in this section or by granting probation or suspending the imposition or execution of sentence with conditions other than those set forth in this section, in which case, the court shall specify on the record and shall enter on the minutes the
 circumstances indicating that the interests of justice would best be served by that disposition.

(e) A violation of this section that is punished by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year shall not constitute a conviction of a crime punishable by imprisonment for a term exceeding one year for the purposes of determining federal firearms eligibility under Section 922(g)(1) of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(f) Nothing in this section, or in Article 3 (commencing with Section 25900) or Article 4 (commencing with Section 26000), shall preclude prosecution under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9 of this title, Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or any other law with
 a greater penalty than this section.

(g) Notwithstanding paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 836, a peace officer may make an arrest without a warrant:

(1) When the person arrested has violated this section, although not in the officer’s presence.

(2) Whenever the officer has reasonable cause to believe that the person to be arrested has violated this section, whether or not this section has, in fact, been violated.

(h) A peace officer may arrest a person for a violation of paragraph (6) of subdivision (c), if the peace officer has probable cause to believe that the person is carrying a handgun in violation of this section and that
 person is not listed with the Department of Justice pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 11106 as the recorded owner of that handgun.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 249, Sec. 9.   (SB 2)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Peace Officer Exemption to the Crime of Carrying a Loaded Firearm in Public [25900. - 25925.]

25900.

As provided in this article, Section 25850 does not apply to any of the following:

(a) Any peace officer, listed in Section 830.1 or 830.2, or subdivision (a) of Section 830.33, whether active or honorably retired.

(b) Any other duly appointed peace officer.

(c) Any honorably retired peace officer listed in subdivision (c) of Section 830.5.

(d) Any other honorably retired peace officer who during the course and scope of his or her appointment as a peace officer was authorized to, and did, carry a firearm.

(e) Any full-time paid peace officer of another state or the federal government who is carrying out official duties while in California.

(f) Any person summoned by any of these officers to assist in making arrests or preserving the peace while the person is actually engaged in assisting that officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 267, Sec. 2.   (AB 703)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

25905.

(a) (1) Any peace officer described in Section 25900 who has been honorably retired shall be issued an identification certificate by the law enforcement agency from which the officer has retired.

(2) If the agency from which the officer has retired
 is no longer providing law enforcement services or the relevant governmental body is dissolved, the agency that subsequently provides law enforcement services for that jurisdiction shall issue the identification certificate to that peace officer. This paragraph shall apply only if the following conditions are met:

(A) The successor agency is in possession of the retired officer’s complete personnel records or can otherwise verify the retired officer’s honorably retired status.

(B) The retired officer is in compliance with all the requirements of the successor agency for the issuance of a retirement identification card and concealed weapon endorsement.

(b) The issuing agency may charge a fee necessary to cover any reasonable expenses incurred by the agency in issuing certificates pursuant to Sections 25900, 25910, 25925, and this section.

(c) Any officer, except an officer listed in Section 830.1 or 830.2, subdivision (a) of Section 830.33, or subdivision (c) of Section 830.5 who retired prior to January 1, 1981, shall have an endorsement on the identification certificate stating that the issuing agency
 approves the officer’s carrying of a loaded firearm.

(d) An honorably retired peace officer listed in Section 830.1 or 830.2, subdivision (a) of Section 830.33, or subdivision (c) of Section 830.5 who retired prior to January 1, 1981, shall not be required to obtain an endorsement from the issuing agency to carry a loaded firearm.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 149, Sec. 1.   (SB 303)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

25910.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), no endorsement or renewal endorsement issued pursuant to Section 25915 shall be effective unless it is in the format set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 25460.

(b) Any peace officer listed in subdivision (f) of Section 830.2 or in subdivision (c) of Section 830.5, who is retired between January 2, 1981, and on or before December 31, 1988, and who is authorized to carry a loaded firearm pursuant to this article, shall not be required to have an endorsement in the format set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 25460 until the time of the issuance, on or after January 1, 1989, of a renewal endorsement pursuant to Section 25915.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25915.

Every five years, a retired peace officer, except an officer listed in Section 830.1 or 830.2, subdivision (a) of Section 830.33, or subdivision (c) of Section 830.5 who retired prior to January 1, 1981, shall petition the issuing agency, or a successor agency pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 25905, for renewal of the privilege to carry a loaded firearm.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 149, Sec. 2.   (SB 303)   Effective January 1, 2014.)